Utah statutes.
10-3-502.   Regular and special council meetings.

(1)  The council of each municipality shall:

(a)  by ordinance prescribe the time and place for holding its regular meeting, subject to Subsection (1)(b); and

(b)  hold a regular meeting at least once each month. 

(2) (a)  The mayor of a municipality or two council members may order the convening of a special meeting of the council.

(b)  Each order convening a special meeting of the council shall:

(i)  be entered in the minutes of the council; and

(ii)  provide at least three hours' notice of the special meeting.

(c)  The municipal recorder or clerk shall serve notice of the special meeting on each council member who did not sign the order by delivering the notice personally or by leaving it at the member's usual place of abode.

(d)  The personal appearance by a council member at a special meeting of the council constitutes a waiver of the notice required under Subsection (2)(c).

